Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2345.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 75DOMESTIC VIOLENCE HOME SECURITY GRANT PROGRAMSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. ProgramSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.7501. Scope of chapter.7502. Definitions.§ 7501. Scope of chapter.12345678910111213141516171819 This chapter relates to domestic violence home security grants.§ 7502. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency."Domestic violence." Conduct constituting abuse as defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions)."Eligible applicant." A victim of domestic violence."Program." The Domestic Violence Home Security Grant Program established under section 7511 (relating to establishment of program)."Residential security measure." A product, service, technology or structural improvement intended to enhance the physical safety and security of a residence, including:(1) A reinforced door or lock.(2) A window lock or shatter-resistant glass.(3) A security camera or surveillance system.(4) An alarm system or monitoring service.(5) Motion-detection lighting.(6) A personal alarm device.SUBCHAPTER BPROGRAMSec.7511. Establishment of program.7512. Administration of program.7513. Applications.7514. Permissible uses of grant.20260HB2345PN3118 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 7515. Award or denial of grant.7516. Confidentiality.§ 7511. Establishment of program.The Domestic Violence Home Security Grant Program is established in the commission.§ 7512. Administration of program.The program shall make grants to eligible applicants to improve the safety and security of their residences.§ 7513. Applications.(a) Development and posting of form.--The commission shall develop a form for an individual to use to apply for a grant under the program. The form:(1) Must contain:(i) The name, address and contact information for the applicant.(ii) The requested amount of the grant.(iii) The proposed use or uses of the grant.(2) Shall be posted by the commission on its publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Submittal of completed form.--The commission shall prescribe the manner in which a completed form must be submitted to the commission for the applicant to receive a grant under the program.(c) Acceptance of completed form.--The commission shall accept applications under this section on a rolling or annual basis, as determined by the commission.(d) Documentation.--(1) As part of the application under this section, the commission shall require reasonable documentation demonstrating that the applicant is a victim of domestic 20260HB2345PN3118 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violence.(2) Acceptable documentation under paragraph (1) includes:(i) A protection from abuse order issued in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse).(ii) A police report or criminal complaint.(iii) Certification from a domestic violence service provider.(iv) Any other documentation deemed sufficient by the commission.(e) Prioritization.--The commission may prioritize applications based on risk factors, including:(1) Recent separation from an abuser or an abusers release from incarceration.(2) The severity of prior threats or acts of violence.(3) Violations of a protection order.(4) The presence of children in the household.(5) Any other factor indicating elevated risk of harm.§ 7514. Permissible uses of grant.A grant under the program may be used to:(1) Reduce the risk of repeat victimization by enabling the victim of domestic violence to purchase and implement effective residential security measures to deter further abuse, harassment or intrusion.(2) Enhance the safety of the victim of domestic violence during periods of heightened risk, including immediately following separation from an abuser or an abuser's release from incarceration.(3) Assist with other efforts to protect the victim of 20260HB2345PN3118 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 domestic violence from future abuse, harassment or intrusion. § 7515. Award or denial of grant.(a) Review and determination.--The commission shall review each completed application under this subchapter to determine whether the applicant is a victim of domestic violence. For each eligible applicant, the commission shall determine the amount of the grant and any condition on the use or uses of the grant.(b) Notice.--The commission shall provide the applicant with notice of the determination under subsection (a). If the commission denies, in full or in part, the request for a grant under this subchapter, the commission shall provide the applicant with reasons for the denial.§ 7516. Confidentiality.Personally identifiable information of applicants under this subchapter shall be confidential and shall not be subject to public disclosure.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2345PN3118 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617